Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB242.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Right-to-Bear-Arms Protection Act.Section 2. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Section 21 of Article I of the Constitution of Pennsylvania, in clear and unambiguous language states that the "right of the citizens to bear arms in defense of themselves and the State shall not be questioned." Section 25 of Article I of the Constitution of Pennsylvania also clearly and unambiguously states that "to guard against transgressions of the high powers which we have delegated, we 12345678910111213141516171819 declare that everything in this article is excepted out of the general powers of government and shall forever remain inviolate," and further finds that both of these are rights of "The People," which are clearly laid out prior to any mention of the framework of government having been defined in the Constitution of Pennsylvania.(2) The right to keep and bear arms is a fundamental right possessed by the individual necessary for defense of self and preservation of liberty and shall not be infringed.(3) It is the intent of the General Assembly to protect State actors from being directed through Federal action to violate their oath of defense and preservation of these individual rights as enumerated in the Constitution of the United States and section 21 of Article I of the Constitution of Pennsylvania of its residents' right to bear arms in defense of themselves and the State.(4) Pursuant to and in furtherance of the principles of Federalism enshrined in the Constitution of the United States, the Federal Government may not commandeer this State's actors to participate in the enforcement or facilitation of any Federal action or regulatory program.(5) This right to be free from the commandeering hand of the Federal Government has been most notably recognized by the United States Supreme Court in Printz v. United States, 521 U.S. 898 (1997), when the Court held: "The Federal Government may neither issue directives requiring the States to address particular problems, nor command the States' officers, or those of their political subdivisions, to administer or enforce a federal regulatory program."(6) The anticommandeering principles recognized by the 20250SB0242PN0195 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Supreme Court in Printz v. United States are predicated upon the advice of James Madison, who in Federalist #46 advised a "refusal to co-operate with the officers of the Union" in response to either unconstitutional Federal measures or constitutional but unpopular Federal measures.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Federal action." Any of the following issued or enacted by the Federal Government:(1) An executive order.(2) An agency order.(3) A statute.(4) A law.(5) A rule.(6) A regulation.(7) An arbitrary clarification or classification, including any of the following:(i) A classification of weapons based on attributes that do not go to a primary combustion function of the firearm, such as natural unmodified rate of fire.(ii) A classification designed to prohibit possession for nonmechanically necessary attributes, such as bayonet lugs, telescoping stocks, muzzle breaks or other fixtures, pistol grips and pistol braces.(iii) A clarification issued through executive or legislative agencies designed to prohibit ownership or possession of firearms based on attributes that are nonmechanically necessary or in common use.20250SB0242PN0195 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Firearm accessory." An item used in conjunction with or affixed to a firearm but that is not mechanically essential to the basic functions of that firearm."Registry." A list generated by regulation, mandate, order or statute that indicates the ownership, residence or storage location of firearms purchased or otherwise legally owned or stored within this Commonwealth."State actor." An official, agent or employee of the Commonwealth or a political subdivision of the Commonwealth. The term includes persons contracting with the Commonwealth.Section 4. Prohibitions.(a) State actors.--A Federal action relating to a firearm, magazine of a firearm, accessory and ammunition, intended to restrict possession, transfer or use of a firearm, magazine of a firearm, accessory and ammunition, shall be unenforceable by a State actor in this Commonwealth.(b) Enforceability.--A Federal action created or taking effect after December 31, 2020, shall be unenforceable within this Commonwealth if the Federal action attempts to register, restrict or ban the ownership or purchase of a firearm, magazine of a firearm, firearm accessory or ammunition, or to reclassify the firearm, accessory or magazine ex post facto where the result is to prohibit or restrict continued ownership or common use. An attempt by the Federal Government to create within this Commonwealth a registry regarding a firearm, component or accessory, ammunition or magazine shall be prohibited.(c) Duty, immunity and penalty.--(1) An official, agent or employee of the Federal Government, or a person who works for the Federal Government in any capacity located within this Commonwealth, or a State 20250SB0242PN0195 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 actor, owes an individual duty to each resident of this Commonwealth to not violate the resident's Federal Second Amendment rights or any similarly situated or applicable rights under the Constitution of the United States or the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania. This duty is established for the purpose of establishing a direct action for civil liability if a State actor breaches this duty against a Commonwealth resident.(2) A State actor charged with or served with processes relating to an act related to enforcing or aiding or abetting an unconstitutional action under paragraph (1) forfeits any civil protections of qualified immunity that their position may bestow and consents jurisdiction necessary to adjudicate action against them for civil violations their actions contributed to in any degree. An action by a State actor enforcing or aiding or abetting an unconstitutional action under paragraph (1):(i) Effectively and summarily waives all qualified immunity that the State actor may have been entitled to prior to taking the action.(ii) Shall constitute prima facie evidence of a civil rights and tort action of a nature that shall afford the affected party a right to a private action against the State actor, their employer dictating the action and persons affiliated or aiding in the commission of the action.(iii) Shall constitute consent to litigation in the forum most convenient to the plaintiff, subject to the Pennsylvania Rules of Civil Procedure.(3) A State actor enforcing or aiding or abetting an 20250SB0242PN0195 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unconstitutional action under paragraph (1) shall be subject to the following:(i) Damages, such as compensatory damages, general damages and punitive damages.(ii) Beginning on the date of a judicial adjudication of a violation of this section:(A) Termination of employment and any entitlements, except for pension or health care benefits related to retirement, bestowed by the employment.(B) A bar from State employment in any capacity for a period of at least 10 years.(iii) A bar from contracting with any State department, agency or office having contracts with the Commonwealth or acting as subcontractors for the Commonwealth.(4) No person may contract with the Commonwealth or submit bids for consideration to a Commonwealth bid request who hires, employs or subcontracts with anyone found liable under this act. A person who violates this paragraph shall be liable as an accessory.(d) Enforcement.--The Attorney General or a district attorney shall prosecute violations of this section. An affected party may bring a private action for a violation of this section, notwithstanding if the Attorney General or a district attorney fails to prosecute.(e) Grant funds and forfeitures.--(1) A political subdivision of this Commonwealth may not receive funds from the Commonwealth if the political subdivision adopts a rule, order, ordinance or policy in 20250SB0242PN0195 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violation of this section. State grant funds for the political subdivision shall be denied for the fiscal year following the year in which a final judicial determination in an action brought under this section is made that the political subdivision has intentionally required actions that violate this section.(2) An agency, office, department or entity of the Commonwealth or a political subdivision of the Commonwealth may not accept Federal money or grants to support or advance a restriction, such as a Federal legislation or directive, that are in violation of this section. Federal money or grants to support or advance a restriction that are deposited with the Commonwealth shall be used for the improvement of State Game Lands and shooting ranges owned and maintained by the Commonwealth. To the extent that a political subdivision has received Federal money or grants to support or advance a restriction, the Federal money or grant must be remitted, within 10 days of receipt, to the State Treasurer for deposit in the General Fund and shall be used for the improvement of State Game Lands and shooting ranges owned and maintained by the Commonwealth. If the use of Federal money or grants is restricted by Federal action, the Federal money or grant must be returned to the appropriate Federal entity.Section 5. Attorney General.The Attorney General shall defend a resident of this Commonwealth who is prosecuted by the Federal Government for a violation of Federal law under section 4(a) that attempts to register, restrict or ban the ownership or purchase of a firearm, magazine of a firearm, firearm accessory or ammunition that is retained in this Commonwealth.20250SB0242PN0195 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 6. Severability.The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250SB0242PN0195 - 8 - 1234567